Missouri, session 2026, SB1373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.158 and 115.221, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 115.158 and 115.221, to read as follows:
115.158. 1. The secretary of state shall implement a
centralized, interactive computerized statewide voter
registration list. This computerized list shall be known as
the "Missouri Voter Registration System". The system shall
be implemented by January 1, 2004, unless a waiver is
obtained pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of 2002. If
a waiver is obtained, the system shall be implemented by
January 1, 2006. The system shall be maintained and
administered by the secretary of state and contain the name
and registration information of every legally registered
voter in Missouri. In addition, the system shall:
(1) Assign a unique identifier to each legally
registered voter in Missouri;
(2) Serve as the single system for storing and
managing the official list of registered voters throughout
Missouri;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1373 2
(3) Be coordinated with other agency databases in
Missouri;
(4) Allow any election official in Missouri, including
local election authorities, immediate electronic access to
the information contained in the system;
(5) Allow all voter registration information obtained
by any local election official in Missouri to be
electronically entered into the system on an expedited basis
at the time the information is provided to the local
official. The secretary of state, as the chief state
election official, shall provide such support as may be
required so that local election officials are able to enter
the registration information; and
(6) Serve as the official voter registration list for
the conduct of all elections in Missouri.
2. Except as provided for in subsection 10 of this
section, the secretary of state and local election
authorities shall perform system maintenance on a regular
basis, which shall include:
(1) Removing names in accordance with the provisions
and procedures of the National Voter Registration Act of
1993 and coordinating system maintenance activities with
state agency records on death and felony status;
(2) Requiring the name of each registered voter to
appear in the system;
(3) Removing only voters who are not registered or who
are not eligible to vote; and
(4) Eliminating duplicate names from the system.
3. The secretary of state shall provide adequate
technological security measures to prevent the unauthorized
access to the system established pursuant to this section.

SB 1373 3
4. The secretary of state shall develop procedures to
ensure that voter registration records within the system are
accurate and updated regularly. At a minimum, the
procedures shall include:
(1) A system of file maintenance that makes a
reasonable effort to remove registrants who are ineligible
to vote. Consistent with the National Voter Registration
Act of 1993, registrants who have not responded to a notice
and who have not voted in two consecutive general elections
for federal office shall be removed from the official list
of eligible voters, except that no registrant may be removed
solely by reason of a failure to vote; and
(2) Safeguards to ensure that eligible voters are not
removed in error.
5. Voter registration information shall be verified in
accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, an application for voter registration may not be
accepted or processed unless the application includes:
(a) In the case of an applicant who has been issued a
current and valid driver's license, the applicant's driver's
license number; or
(b) In the case of any other applicant, other than an
applicant to whom subdivision (2) applies, the last four
digits of the applicant's Social Security number.
(2) If an applicant for voter registration has not
been issued a current and valid driver's license or a Social
Security number, the applicant shall be assigned a number
which will serve to identify the applicant for voter
registration purposes. The number assigned under this
subdivision shall be used as the unique identifying number
within the system.

SB 1373 4
(3) The secretary of state and the director of the
department of revenue shall enter into an agreement to match
information in the database of the voter registration system
with information in the database of the motor vehicle system
to enable the secretary to verify the accuracy of
information provided on applications for voter registration.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall
enter into an agreement with the commissioner of Social
Security and comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
6. In addition to using the system for voter
registration, the election authorities and secretary of
state may use the system for the collection and
dissemination of election results and other pertinent
information. Any information contained in any state or
local voter registration system, limited to the master voter
registration list or any other list generated from the
information, subject to chapter 610, shall not be used for
commercial purposes; provided, however, that the information
may be used for elections, for candidates, or for ballot
measures, furnished at a reasonable fee. Violation of this
100 section shall be a class B misdemeanor. For purposes of
101 this section, "commercial purposes" means the use of a
102 public record for the purpose of sale or resale or for the
103 purpose of producing a document containing all or part of
104 the copy, printout, or photograph for sale or the obtaining
105 of names and addresses from public records for the purpose
106 of solicitation or the sale of names and addresses to
107 another for the purpose of solicitation or for any purpose
108 in which the purchaser can reasonably anticipate the receipt
109 of monetary gain from the direct or indirect use of the
110 public record.

SB 1373 5
111 7. The secretary of state shall establish an advisory
112 committee to assist in the establishment and maintenance of
113 the Missouri voter registration system.
114 8. The secretary of state may promulgate rules to
115 execute this section. No rule or portion of a rule
116 promulgated pursuant to the authority of this section shall
117 become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to
118 chapter 536.
119 9. Election authorities and any agency required under
120 the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to accept voter
121 registration applications shall forward registration and
122 other data in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state
123 to assist with administering and maintaining the Missouri
124 voter registration system in accordance with the Help
125 America Vote Act of 2002.
126 10. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of
127 this section to the contrary, the secretary of state shall
128 not remove a registered voter from the system due to
129 inactivity unless it has been more than five calendar years
130 since the registered voter last voted. Before removing
131 voters after five calendar years of inactivity, the
132 secretary of state shall provide written notice to the
133 registered voter with instructions for re-registration.
115.221. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law
to the contrary, each election authority may have the voting
records inspected and may investigate the qualifications of
any person who has not voted or transferred his registration
within the [four] five preceding calendar years.
✓